Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3973
Department; rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Milk Act.

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 198, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 2-3908;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 9.